src/Korektor/sr.aff
FLAG num
SFX 1031 Y 13
SFX 1031 њ њи
SFX 1031 њ њег
SFX 1031 њ њега
SFX 1031 њ њем
SFX 1031 њ њему
SFX 1031 њ њим
SFX 1031 њ њих
SFX 1031 њ њима
SFX 1031 њ ње
SFX 1031 њ ња
SFX 1031 њ њој
SFX 1031 њ њу
SFX 1031 њ њом

SFX 1032 Y 13
SFX 1032 к кши
SFX 1032 к кшег
SFX 1032 к кшега
SFX 1032 к кшем
SFX 1032 к кшему
SFX 1032 к кшим
SFX 1032 к кших
SFX 1032 к кшима
SFX 1032 к кше
SFX 1032 к кша
SFX 1032 к кшој
SFX 1032 к кшу
SFX 1032 к кшом

SFX 1033 Y 13
SFX 1033 ви вљи
SFX 1033 ви вљег
SFX 1033 ви вљега
SFX 1033 ви вљем
SFX 1033 ви вљему
SFX 1033 ви вљим
SFX 1033 ви вљих
SFX 1033 ви вљима
SFX 1033 ви вље
SFX 1033 ви вља
SFX 1033 ви вљој
SFX 1033 ви вљу
SFX 1033 ви вљом

SFX 1034 Y 13
SFX 1034 н њи
SFX 1034 н њег
SFX 1034 н њега
SFX 1034 н њем
SFX 1034 н њему
SFX 1034 н њим
SFX 1034 н њих
SFX 1034 н њима
SFX 1034 н ње
SFX 1034 н ња
SFX 1034 н њој
SFX 1034 н њу
SFX 1034 н њом

SFX 1035 Y 13
SFX 1035 п пши
SFX 1035 п пшег
SFX 1035 п пшега
SFX 1035 п пшем
SFX 1035 п пшему
SFX 1035 п пшим
SFX 1035 п пших
SFX 1035 п пшима
SFX 1035 п пше
SFX 1035 п пша
SFX 1035 п пшој
SFX 1035 п пшу
SFX 1035 п пшом

SFX 1036 Y 13
SFX 1036 ш шији
SFX 1036 ш шијег
SFX 1036 ш шијега
SFX 1036 ш шијем
SFX 1036 ш шијему
SFX 1036 ш шијим
SFX 1036 ш шијих
SFX 1036 ш шијима
SFX 1036 ш шије
SFX 1036 ш шија
SFX 1036 ш шијој
SFX 1036 ш шију
SFX 1036 ш шијом

SFX 1037 Y 13
SFX 1037 ли њи
SFX 1037 ли њег
SFX 1037 ли њега
SFX 1037 ли њем
SFX 1037 ли њему
SFX 1037 ли њим
SFX 1037 ли њих
SFX 1037 ли њима
SFX 1037 ли ње
SFX 1037 ли ња
SFX 1037 ли њој
SFX 1037 ли њу
SFX 1037 ли њом

SFX 1038 Y 13
SFX 1038 р рији
SFX 1038 р ријег
SFX 1038 р ријега
SFX 1038 р ријем
SFX 1038 р ријему
SFX 1038 р ријим
SFX 1038 р ријих
SFX 1038 р ријима
SFX 1038 р рије
SFX 1038 р рија
SFX 1038 р ријој
SFX 1038 р рију
SFX 1038 р ријом

SFX 1039 Y 13
SFX 1039 ав вији
SFX 1039 ав вијег
SFX 1039 ав вијега
SFX 1039 ав вијем
SFX 1039 ав вијему
SFX 1039 ав вијим
SFX 1039 ав вијих
SFX 1039 ав вијима
SFX 1039 ав вије
SFX 1039 ав вија
SFX 1039 ав вијој
SFX 1039 ав вију
SFX 1039 ав вијом

SFX 1040 Y 13
SFX 1040 ао лији
SFX 1040 ао лијег
SFX 1040 ао лијега
SFX 1040 ао лијем
SFX 1040 ао лијему
SFX 1040 ао лијим
SFX 1040 ао лијих
SFX 1040 ао лијима
SFX 1040 ао лије
SFX 1040 ао лија
SFX 1040 ао лијој
SFX 1040 ао лију
SFX 1040 ао лијом

SFX 1041 Y 13
SFX 1041 п пији
SFX 1041 п пијег
SFX 1041 п пијега
SFX 1041 п пијем
SFX 1041 п пијему
SFX 1041 п пијим
SFX 1041 п пијих
SFX 1041 п пијима
SFX 1041 п пије
SFX 1041 п пија
SFX 1041 п пијој
SFX 1041 п пију
SFX 1041 п пијом

SFX 1042 Y 13
SFX 1042 л лији
SFX 1042 л лијег
SFX 1042 л лијега
SFX 1042 л лијем
SFX 1042 л лијему
SFX 1042 л лијим
SFX 1042 л лијих
SFX 1042 л лијима
SFX 1042 л лије
SFX 1042 л лија
SFX 1042 л лијој
SFX 1042 л лију
SFX 1042 л лијом

SFX 1043 Y 26
SFX 1043 в вљи
SFX 1043 в вљег
SFX 1043 в вљега
SFX 1043 в вљем
SFX 1043 в вљему
SFX 1043 в вљим
SFX 1043 в вљих
SFX 1043 в вљима
SFX 1043 в вље
SFX 1043 в вља
SFX 1043 в вљој
SFX 1043 в вљу
SFX 1043 в вљом
SFX 1043 в вији
SFX 1043 в вијег
SFX 1043 в вијега
SFX 1043 в вијем
SFX 1043 в вијему
SFX 1043 в вијим
SFX 1043 в вијих
SFX 1043 в вијима
SFX 1043 в вије
SFX 1043 в вија
SFX 1043 в вијој
SFX 1043 в вију
SFX 1043 в вијом

SFX 1044 Y 13
SFX 1044 х хији
SFX 1044 х хијег
SFX 1044 х хијега
SFX 1044 х хијем
SFX 1044 х хијему
SFX 1044 х хијим
SFX 1044 х хијих
SFX 1044 х хијима
SFX 1044 х хије
SFX 1044 х хија
SFX 1044 х хијој
SFX 1044 х хију
SFX 1044 х хијом

SFX 1045 Y 13
SFX 1045 х ши
SFX 1045 х шег
SFX 1045 х шега
SFX 1045 х шем
SFX 1045 х шему
SFX 1045 х шим
SFX 1045 х ших
SFX 1045 х шима
SFX 1045 х ше
SFX 1045 х ша
SFX 1045 х шој
SFX 1045 х шу
SFX 1045 х шом

SFX 1046 Y 26
SFX 1046 д ђи
SFX 1046 д ђег
SFX 1046 д ђега
SFX 1046 д ђем
SFX 1046 д ђему
SFX 1046 д ђим
SFX 1046 д ђих
SFX 1046 д ђима
SFX 1046 д ђе
SFX 1046 д ђа
SFX 1046 д ђој
SFX 1046 д ђу
SFX 1046 д ђом
SFX 1046 д дији
SFX 1046 д дијег
SFX 1046 д дијега
SFX 1046 д дијем
SFX 1046 д дијему
SFX 1046 д дијим
SFX 1046 д дијих
SFX 1046 д дијима
SFX 1046 д дије
SFX 1046 д дија
SFX 1046 д дијој
SFX 1046 д дију
SFX 1046 д дијом

SFX 1047 Y 13
SFX 1047 ђ ђи
SFX 1047 ђ ђег
SFX 1047 ђ ђега
SFX 1047 ђ ђем
SFX 1047 ђ ђему
SFX 1047 ђ ђим
SFX 1047 ђ ђих
SFX 1047 ђ ђима
SFX 1047 ђ ђе
SFX 1047 ђ ђа
SFX 1047 ђ ђој
SFX 1047 ђ ђу
SFX 1047 ђ ђом

SFX 1048 Y 13
SFX 1048 ж жији
SFX 1048 ж жијег
SFX 1048 ж жијега
SFX 1048 ж жијем
SFX 1048 ж жијему
SFX 1048 ж жијим
SFX 1048 ж жијих
SFX 1048 ж жијима
SFX 1048 ж жије
SFX 1048 ж жија
SFX 1048 ж жијој
SFX 1048 ж жију
SFX 1048 ж жијом

SFX 1049 Y 13
SFX 1049 б бији
SFX 1049 б бијег
SFX 1049 б бијега
SFX 1049 б бијем
SFX 1049 б бијему
SFX 1049 б бијим
SFX 1049 б бијих
SFX 1049 б бијима
SFX 1049 б бије
SFX 1049 б бија
SFX 1049 б бијој
SFX 1049 б бију
SFX 1049 б бијом

SFX 1050 Y 26
SFX 1050 н нији
SFX 1050 н нијег
SFX 1050 н нијега
SFX 1050 н нијем
SFX 1050 н нијему
SFX 1050 н нијим
SFX 1050 н нијих
SFX 1050 н нијима
SFX 1050 н није
SFX 1050 н нија
SFX 1050 н нијој
SFX 1050 н нију
SFX 1050 н нијом
SFX 1050 н њи
SFX 1050 н њег
SFX 1050 н њега
SFX 1050 н њем
SFX 1050 н њему
SFX 1050 н њим
SFX 1050 н њих
SFX 1050 н њима
SFX 1050 н ње
SFX 1050 н ња
SFX 1050 н њој
SFX 1050 н њу
SFX 1050 н њом

SFX 1051 Y 13
SFX 1051 ђ ђији
SFX 1051 ђ ђијег
SFX 1051 ђ ђијега
SFX 1051 ђ ђијем
SFX 1051 ђ ђијему
SFX 1051 ђ ђијим
SFX 1051 ђ ђијих
SFX 1051 ђ ђијима
SFX 1051 ђ ђије
SFX 1051 ђ ђија
SFX 1051 ђ ђијој
SFX 1051 ђ ђију
SFX 1051 ђ ђијом

SFX 1052 Y 13
SFX 1052 нко њи
SFX 1052 нко њег
SFX 1052 нко њега
SFX 1052 нко њем
SFX 1052 нко њему
SFX 1052 нко њим
SFX 1052 нко њих
SFX 1052 нко њима
SFX 1052 нко ње
SFX 1052 нко ња
SFX 1052 нко њој
SFX 1052 нко њу
SFX 1052 нко њом

SFX 1053 Y 13
SFX 1053 шки жи
SFX 1053 шки жег
SFX 1053 шки жега
SFX 1053 шки жем
SFX 1053 шки жему
SFX 1053 шки жим
SFX 1053 шки жих
SFX 1053 шки жима
SFX 1053 шки же
SFX 1053 шки жа
SFX 1053 шки жој
SFX 1053 шки жу
SFX 1053 шки жом

SFX 1054 Y 13
SFX 1054 рок ри
SFX 1054 рок рег
SFX 1054 рок рега
SFX 1054 рок рем
SFX 1054 рок рему
SFX 1054 рок рим
SFX 1054 рок рих
SFX 1054 рок рима
SFX 1054 рок ре
SFX 1054 рок ра
SFX 1054 рок рој
SFX 1054 рок ру
SFX 1054 рок ром

SFX 1055 Y 13
SFX 1055 аљ љи
SFX 1055 аљ љег
SFX 1055 аљ љега
SFX 1055 аљ љем
SFX 1055 аљ љему
SFX 1055 аљ љим
SFX 1055 аљ љих
SFX 1055 аљ љима
SFX 1055 аљ ље
SFX 1055 аљ ља
SFX 1055 аљ љој
SFX 1055 аљ љу
SFX 1055 аљ љом

SFX 1056 Y 13
SFX 1056 н нски
SFX 1056 н нског
SFX 1056 н нскога
SFX 1056 н нском
SFX 1056 н нскоме
SFX 1056 н нским
SFX 1056 н нских
SFX 1056 н нскима
SFX 1056 н нске
SFX 1056 н нска
SFX 1056 н нској
SFX 1056 н нску
SFX 1056 н нско

SFX 1057 Y 13
SFX 1057 цо чки
SFX 1057 цо чког
SFX 1057 цо чкога
SFX 1057 цо чком
SFX 1057 цо чкоме
SFX 1057 цо чким
SFX 1057 цо чких
SFX 1057 цо чкима
SFX 1057 цо чке
SFX 1057 цо чка
SFX 1057 цо чкој
SFX 1057 цо чку
SFX 1057 цо чко

SFX 1058 Y 13
SFX 1058 а ански
SFX 1058 а анског
SFX 1058 а анскога
SFX 1058 а анском
SFX 1058 а анскоме
SFX 1058 а анским
SFX 1058 а анских
SFX 1058 а анскима
SFX 1058 а анске
SFX 1058 а анска
SFX 1058 а анској
SFX 1058 а анску
SFX 1058 а анско

SFX 1059 Y 13
SFX 1059 а ски
SFX 1059 а ског
SFX 1059 а скога
SFX 1059 а ском
SFX 1059 а скоме
SFX 1059 а ским
SFX 1059 а ских
SFX 1059 а скима
SFX 1059 а ске
SFX 1059 а ска
SFX 1059 а ској
SFX 1059 а ску
SFX 1059 а ско

SFX 1060 Y 13
SFX 1060 р рски
SFX 1060 р рског
SFX 1060 р рскога
SFX 1060 р рском
SFX 1060 р рскоме
SFX 1060 р рским
SFX 1060 р рских
SFX 1060 р рскима
SFX 1060 р рске
SFX 1060 р рска
SFX 1060 р рској
SFX 1060 р рску
SFX 1060 р рско

SFX 1061 Y 13
SFX 1061 ц чки
SFX 1061 ц чког
SFX 1061 ц чкога
SFX 1061 ц чком
SFX 1061 ц чкоме
SFX 1061 ц чким
SFX 1061 ц чких
SFX 1061 ц чкима
SFX 1061 ц чке
SFX 1061 ц чка
SFX 1061 ц чкој
SFX 1061 ц чку
SFX 1061 ц чко

SFX 1062 Y 13
SFX 1062 с шки
SFX 1062 с шког
SFX 1062 с шкога
SFX 1062 с шком
SFX 1062 с шкоме
SFX 1062 с шким
SFX 1062 с шких
SFX 1062 с шкима
SFX 1062 с шке
SFX 1062 с шка
SFX 1062 с шкој
SFX 1062 с шку
SFX 1062 с шко

SFX 1063 Y 13
SFX 1063 ци ачки
SFX 1063 ци ачког
SFX 1063 ци ачкога
SFX 1063 ци ачком
SFX 1063 ци ачкоме
SFX 1063 ци ачким
SFX 1063 ци ачких
SFX 1063 ци ачкима
SFX 1063 ци ачке
SFX 1063 ци ачка
SFX 1063 ци ачкој
SFX 1063 ци ачку
SFX 1063 ци ачко

SFX 1064 Y 13
SFX 1064 ћи ћки
SFX 1064 ћи ћког
SFX 1064 ћи ћкога
SFX 1064 ћи ћком
SFX 1064 ћи ћкоме
SFX 1064 ћи ћким
SFX 1064 ћи ћких
SFX 1064 ћи ћкима
SFX 1064 ћи ћке
SFX 1064 ћи ћка
SFX 1064 ћи ћкој
SFX 1064 ћи ћку
SFX 1064 ћи ћко

SFX 1065 Y 13
SFX 1065 е ски
SFX 1065 е ског
SFX 1065 е скога
SFX 1065 е ском
SFX 1065 е скоме
SFX 1065 е ским
SFX 1065 е ских
SFX 1065 е скима
SFX 1065 е ске
SFX 1065 е ска
SFX 1065 е ској
SFX 1065 е ску
SFX 1065 е ско

SFX 1066 Y 13
SFX 1066 д дски
SFX 1066 д дског
SFX 1066 д дскога
SFX 1066 д дском
SFX 1066 д дскоме
SFX 1066 д дским
SFX 1066 д дских
SFX 1066 д дскима
SFX 1066 д дске
SFX 1066 д дска
SFX 1066 д дској
SFX 1066 д дску
SFX 1066 д дско

SFX 1067 Y 13
SFX 1067 и ски
SFX 1067 и ског
SFX 1067 и скога
SFX 1067 и ском
SFX 1067 и скоме
SFX 1067 и ским
SFX 1067 и ских
SFX 1067 и скима
SFX 1067 и ске
SFX 1067 и ска
SFX 1067 и ској
SFX 1067 и ску
SFX 1067 и ско

SFX 1068 Y 13
SFX 1068 ца чки
SFX 1068 ца чког
SFX 1068 ца чкога
SFX 1068 ца чком
SFX 1068 ца чкоме
SFX 1068 ца чким
SFX 1068 ца чких
SFX 1068 ца чкима
SFX 1068 ца чке
SFX 1068 ца чка
SFX 1068 ца чкој
SFX 1068 ца чку
SFX 1068 ца чко

SFX 1069 Y 26
SFX 1069 а ски
SFX 1069 а ског
SFX 1069 а скога
SFX 1069 а ском
SFX 1069 а скоме
SFX 1069 а ским
SFX 1069 а ских
SFX 1069 а скима
SFX 1069 а ске
SFX 1069 а ска
SFX 1069 а ској
SFX 1069 а ску
SFX 1069 а ско
SFX 1069 а атски
SFX 1069 а атског
SFX 1069 а атскога
SFX 1069 а атском
SFX 1069 а атскоме
SFX 1069 а атским
SFX 1069 а атских
SFX 1069 а атскима
SFX 1069 а атске
SFX 1069 а атска
SFX 1069 а атској
SFX 1069 а атску
SFX 1069 а атско

SFX 1070 Y 13
SFX 1070 в вски
SFX 1070 в вског
SFX 1070 в вскога
SFX 1070 в вском
SFX 1070 в вскоме
SFX 1070 в вским
SFX 1070 в вских
SFX 1070 в вскима
SFX 1070 в вске
SFX 1070 в вска
SFX 1070 в вској
SFX 1070 в вску
SFX 1070 в вско

SFX 1071 Y 13
SFX 1071 о оански
SFX 1071 о оанског
SFX 1071 о оанскога
SFX 1071 о оанском
SFX 1071 о оанскоме
SFX 1071 о оанским
SFX 1071 о оанских
SFX 1071 о оанскима
SFX 1071 о оанске
SFX 1071 о оанска
SFX 1071 о оанској
SFX 1071 о оанску
SFX 1071 о оанско

SFX 1072 Y 13
SFX 1072 о ански
SFX 1072 о анског
SFX 1072 о анскога
SFX 1072 о анском
SFX 1072 о анскоме
SFX 1072 о анским
SFX 1072 о анских
SFX 1072 о анскима
SFX 1072 о анске
SFX 1072 о анска
SFX 1072 о анској
SFX 1072 о анску
SFX 1072 о анско

SFX 1073 Y 13
SFX 1073 це ачки
SFX 1073 це ачког
SFX 1073 це ачкога
SFX 1073 це ачком
SFX 1073 це ачкоме
SFX 1073 це ачким
SFX 1073 це ачких
SFX 1073 це ачкима
SFX 1073 це ачке
SFX 1073 це ачка
SFX 1073 це ачкој
SFX 1073 це ачку
SFX 1073 це ачко

SFX 1074 Y 13
SFX 1074 ија ски
SFX 1074 ија ског
SFX 1074 ија скога
SFX 1074 ија ском
SFX 1074 ија скоме
SFX 1074 ија ским
SFX 1074 ија ских
SFX 1074 ија скима
SFX 1074 ија ске
SFX 1074 ија ска
SFX 1074 ија ској
SFX 1074 ија ску
SFX 1074 ија ско

SFX 1075 Y 13
SFX 1075 и ијски
SFX 1075 и ијског
SFX 1075 и ијскога
SFX 1075 и ијском
SFX 1075 и ијскоме
SFX 1075 и ијским
SFX 1075 и ијских
SFX 1075 и ијскима
SFX 1075 и ијске
SFX 1075 и ијска
SFX 1075 и ијској
SFX 1075 и ијску
SFX 1075 и ијско

SFX 1076 Y 13
SFX 1076 о ски
SFX 1076 о ског
SFX 1076 о скога
SFX 1076 о ском
SFX 1076 о скоме
SFX 1076 о ским
SFX 1076 о ских
SFX 1076 о скима
SFX 1076 о ске
SFX 1076 о ска
SFX 1076 о ској
SFX 1076 о ску
SFX 1076 о ско

SFX 1077 Y 13
SFX 1077 с ски
SFX 1077 с ског
SFX 1077 с скога
SFX 1077 с ском
SFX 1077 с скоме
SFX 1077 с ским
SFX 1077 с ских
SFX 1077 с скима
SFX 1077 с ске
SFX 1077 с ска
SFX 1077 с ској
SFX 1077 с ску
SFX 1077 с ско

SFX 1078 Y 13
SFX 1078 ће ћки
SFX 1078 ће ћког
SFX 1078 ће ћкога
SFX 1078 ће ћком
SFX 1078 ће ћкоме
SFX 1078 ће ћким
SFX 1078 ће ћких
SFX 1078 ће ћкима
SFX 1078 ће ћке
SFX 1078 ће ћка
SFX 1078 ће ћкој
SFX 1078 ће ћку
SFX 1078 ће ћко
